Utah statutes.
17-19-28.   Destruction of fee statements, warrants and claims filed for 10 years.

The county auditor of each county may remove from his files and destroy or otherwise dispose of all fee statements of county officers, all county warrants, and all claims against the county which have been on file in his office 10 years or more.



No Change Since 1953

